Utah statutes.
63G-6-802 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Effect of timely protest or appeal.

In the event of a timely protest under Subsection 63G-6-801(1), or a timely appeal of the protest under Section 63G-6-807 or 63G-6-815, a state executive branch agency or a local public procurement unit may not proceed further with the solicitation or with the award of the contract until:

(1)  all administrative and judicial remedies are exhausted;

(2)  for a protest under Section 63G-6-801 or an appeal under Section 63G-6-807:

(a)  the chief procurement officer, after consultation with the attorney general's office and the head of the using agency, makes a written determination that award of the contract without delay is necessary to protect substantial interests of the state;

(b)  the head of the purchasing agency, after consultation with the attorney general's office, makes a written determination that award of the contract without delay is necessary to protect substantial interests of the state; or

(c)  for a local public procurement unit that is not represented by the attorney general's office, the local public procurement unit, after consulting with the attorney for the local public procurement unit, makes a written determination that award of the contract without delay is necessary to protect substantial interests of the local public procurement unit; or

(3)  for an appeal under Section 63G-6-815, or an appeal to a higher court than district court:

(a)  the chief procurement officer, after consultation with the attorney general's office and the head of the using agency, makes a written determination that award of the contract without delay is in the best interest of the state;

(b)  the head of the purchasing agency, after consultation with the attorney general's office, makes a written determination that award of the contract without delay is in the best interest of the state; or

(c)  for a local public procurement unit that is not represented by the attorney general's office, the local public procurement unit, after consulting with the attorney for the local public procurement unit, makes a written determination that award of the contract without delay is necessary to protect the best interest of the local public procurement unit.

